dev/verbs.chopped.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="atr/ast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīšu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsim</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsiet</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīsit</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adīs</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adām</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adāt</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odu</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odam</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odi</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odat</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iesā/kties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kšos</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ksimies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ksies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ksities</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ksieties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ksies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kos</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kāmies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kāties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kās</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kos</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kamies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>katies</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kties</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kas</l>
          <r>kties<s n="vblex"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="atrast"><i>atr</i><par n="atr/ast__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iesākties"><i>iesā</i><par n="iesā/kties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ierast"><i>ier</i><par n="atr/ast__vblex"/></e>
